Arkansas, session 2025, SB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-362-132(c), concerning exemptions of
regional airports from annexation and municipal regulation, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) An authority may detach from a municipality upon compliance with
the detachment requirements under § 14-362-301 et seq. If a municipality in
which the property of an authority is located merges with, is annexed to, or
is consolidated with another municipality, the authority may detach from the
municipality upon the approval of a majority vote of the board of directors
of the authority.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 362, Subchapter 3, is
repealed.
Subchapter 3 - Annexation and Detachment
14-362-301. Legislative findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
*ZRC010*
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
(1) The public and governmental functions of an authority
required under this chapter are best achieved by giving the authority the
discretion to determine whether it is in the best interest of the authority
to achieve its mission in conjunction with or separate from a municipality;
(2) The requirements of this subchapter are:
(A) Supplemental to constitutional or statutory provisions
now existing or later adopted which may provide for an authority's annexation
or detachment from a municipality; and
(B) Intended to:
(i) Provide for the orderly detachment of an
authority from one (1) or more municipalities in a manner that protects the
interests of the authority and the municipality; and
(ii) Ensure to the extent a municipality may have
issued bonds or other evidences of indebtedness secured by or payable from a
tax or other revenue relating to the operations of the authority, that the
bonds or other evidences of indebtedness are protected so that the contract
for repayment between a municipality and any third party is not impaired.

14-362-302. Involuntary annexation prohibited.
Property owned by an authority that is not within the corporate limits
of a municipality shall not be annexed by a municipality without a two-thirds
(⅔) vote of approval by the members of the board of directors of the
authority.

14-362-303. Coordination with Arkansas Geographic Information Systems
Office to annex or detach.
Before an authority begins an annexation or detachment proceeding under
this subchapter, the authority shall coordinate with the Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Office for preparation of legal descriptions and digital
mapping for the annexation or detachment areas.

14-362-304. Petition for annexation — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “enclave” means an unincorporated
improved or developed area that is enclosed within and bounded on all sides
by a single city or incorporated town.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an authority
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
may petition a municipality for voluntary annexation in the same manner
provided in § 14-40-609.
(c)(1) The creation of an enclave owned by an authority is not
prohibited under this section.
(2) An authority petitioning a municipality to annex land
containing an enclave under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall include
the following in the petition:
(A) The reason the authority's continued ownership of the
enclave is necessary; and
(B) The authority's intended use of the enclave.

14-362-305. Petition for detachment.
(a) An authority may petition for detachment under this section upon
the passing of a resolution by the board of directors of the authority:
(1) Recommending the detachment of property owned by the
authority from one (1) or more municipalities in which the authority's
property is located; and
(2) Approved by a vote of at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members
of the board.
(b)(1) An authority shall file a petition for detachment in the county
in which the property the authority is petitioning for detachment is located
with the:
(A) County court;
(B) County assessor; and
(C) County clerk.
(2) A petition filed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Be in writing;
(B) Name the persons authorized to act on behalf of the
authority;
(C) Contain an attestation signed before a notary or
notaries by a person authorized to sign for the authority as the owner of the
property or an agent of the authority confirming the desire to be detached;
(D) Contain an accurate description of the relevant
property;
(E) Contain a letter or title opinion from a certified
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
abstractor or title company verifying that the authority is the owner of
record of the relevant property;
(F) Contain a letter or verification from a certified
surveyor or engineer verifying that an enclave that is not owned by the
authority will not be created;
(G) Include a schedule of services that are currently
provided by the municipality to the property being detached; and
(H) Identify any special considerations or factors that
the authority and municipality should agree to before the detachment is
finalized, including without limitation:
(i) The negotiation of outstanding debt obligations;
and
(ii) A determination of all financial matters
pertaining to the schedule of services provided by the municipality under
subdivision (b)(2)(G) of this section.
(c)(1) Within fifteen (15) days from the date the petition is filed
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the county assessor and the county
clerk shall:
(A) Determine whether the petition meets the requirements
of subdivision (b)(2) of this section; and
(B) Report the determination required under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section to the county court.
(2)(A) If it is determined that the petition does not meet the
requirements of subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the county court shall
enter a court order identifying the deficiencies in the petition within five
(5) business days from the date the determination was reported to the county
court under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section.
(B)(i) An authority may file an amended petition at any
time after the county court enters the court order required under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section.
(ii) The amended petition is required to meet the
requirements of subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(3) If a county assessor and a county clerk report that the
petition meets the requirements of subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the
county court has fifteen (15) business days from the date the determination
was reported to:
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
(A) Review the petition and records for completeness and
accuracy;
(B) Determine that the detachment does not create an
enclave that is not owned by the authority;
(C) Confirm the petition contains the schedule of services
required by subdivision (b)(2)(G) of this section;
(D) At the discretion of the county judge, determine
whether the county will be responsible for the maintenance of dedicated
public roads and rights-of-way abutting or traversing the property that is
being detached; and
(E) Issue an order stating the findings required under
this subdivision (c)(3) and provide the:
(i) Order to the authority; and
(ii) Petition and order to the municipality to which
the authority is petitioning for detachment.
(d)(1) An order issued under subdivision (c)(3)(E) of this section
shall require the municipality being petitioned for detachment to file a
response with the county court:
(A) Within fifteen (15) business days from the date the
court order was received; and
(B) That states whether the municipality agrees or does
not agree with the special considerations or factors to be addressed before
the detachment is finalized under subdivision (b)(2)(H) of this section.
(2) A municipality that does not agree with the special
considerations or factors stated in the petition under subdivision (b)(2)(H)
of this section shall file a response with the county court that:
(A) States the reason the municipality disagrees with the
special considerations or factors stated in the petition under subdivision
(b)(2)(H) of this section; and
(B) Includes any additional special considerations or
factors the municipality may have.
(e)(1) An authority has five (5) business days from the date the
municipality files the response required under subdivision (d)(2) of this
section to respond to the municipality's additional special considerations or
factors under subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section.
(2)(A) If the authority does not agree with the additional
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
special considerations or factors, the county court clerk shall set a hearing
date to determine the special considerations or factors to be addressed
before detachment.
(B) The hearing under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall be set on a date of earliest convenience for both parties but
no later than sixty (60) calendar days after the filing of the authority's
response under subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(3)(A) If a municipality agrees with the special considerations
or factors in the petition required under subdivision (b)(2)(H) of this
section, then the county court shall enter an order providing a timeline for
the authority and the municipality to negotiate in good faith and to reach an
agreement with respect to the special considerations or factors required
before detachment is finalized.
(B) Unless a different period of time is mutually agreed
to by the municipality and the authority, the county court shall require the
municipality and the authority to report their agreement to the county court
not later than ninety (90) calendar days from the date the order was filed.
(C)(i) If an authority and a municipality cannot reach an
agreement by the deadline provided under this subdivision (e)(3), the county
court shall order the municipality and authority to participate in mediation.
(ii) The mediation shall take place not later than
sixty (60) calendar days from the date of the order requiring mediation.
(iii)(a) The mediator shall file a mediation report
with the county court no later than thirty (30) calendar days after the date
of the mediation required under subdivision (e)(3)(C)(i) of this section.
(b) The mediator's report shall:
(1) Contain the agreed-upon terms
relating to the special considerations and factors, but only if the mediation
is successful; or
(2) If the mediation is unsuccessful,
state that the parties were unable to come to an agreement relating to the
special considerations and factors.
(iv)(a) The county court shall enter an order
confirming the detachment, and no later than thirty (30) calendar days from
the date the mediation report is filed, the county clerk shall forward a copy
of the order to the county assessor and to the Secretary of State.
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
(b) The order shall contain:
(1) The final terms relating to the
special considerations and factors, but only if the mediation is successful;
or
(2) If the mediation is unsuccessful,
the order shall only address the matters required under § 14-362-306.
(f) The property shall be detached from the municipality on the date
the county court enters the order confirming the detachment and the county
clerk forwards a copy of the order as required under subdivision
(e)(3)(C)(iv) of this section.
(g)(1) This section shall not prevent the municipality and the
authority from presenting a joint agreement confirming their mutually agreed-
upon resolution of special considerations or factors that should be addressed
before detachment at any time after the petition for detachment is filed by
the authority.
(2) Absent a determination by the county court that the mutually
agreed-upon resolution under subdivision (g)(1) of this section violates
Arkansas law, the county court shall accept the mutually agreed-upon
resolution and include it in the order approving detachment.

14-362-306. Special considerations relating to existing municipal debt
obligations.
(a) If an authority detaches from a municipality that has previously
issued and currently has outstanding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness
that are secured by or payable from taxes or other revenues relating to the
operations of the authority, then the detachment shall not be effective until
the authority and the municipality mutually have attempted to agree in
writing to a lump-sum payment or recurring or periodic payments in an amount
sufficient to avoid impairing the municipality's contractual obligations to
the persons or entities to which payment is due.
(b) In reaching the agreement required under subsection (a) of this
section, an authority and the municipality may engage with and rely on the
opinions and reports of legal and financial professionals to ensure that the
agreement reached by the authority and the municipality does not diminish the
prospects of, or adversely interfere with, expected payments to be received
by the persons or entities to which payment is due, and therefore does not
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
unconstitutionally impair the contract between the municipality and the
persons or entities to which payment is due.
(c)(1) If an authority and a municipality cannot reach an agreement,
any taxes or other revenues relating to the operations of the authority shall
be collected in the same manner and amounts as if the land had not been
detached.
(2) However, after a petition for detachment has been filed by
the authority, the municipality:
(A) Shall not take any action to:
(i) Increase the taxes assessed or levied;
(ii) Lengthen the maturity date of the debt
obligations;
(iii) Decrease amounts paid by other persons or
entities that are contributing to amounts used by the municipality to pay the
debt obligations; or
(iv) Reallocate available revenues to the detriment
of the authority beyond those in existence as of the date of the filing of
the petition with the county court; and
(B) As permitted by the documents relating to the debt
obligations, shall use or escrow all pledged taxes and revenues to pay off or
prepay the debt obligations and shall not use the pledged taxes and revenues
for any other purpose.
(d)(1) An authority and a municipality shall enter into a payment in
lieu of taxes agreement, interlocal cooperative agreement, or similar
agreement documenting the agreement reached by the authority and the
municipality with respect to any taxes collected or payments made by the
authority while debt obligations are outstanding.
(2) The agreement required under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall contain terms and conditions permitting the renegotiation or
revision of payments in the event of unforeseen force majeure events,
including without limitation a global pandemic or population or retail
growth, that significantly modify the facts known or assumptions made in
calculating the payments agreed upon.
(3) The municipality shall provide the certificates and
directions to the Department of Finance and Administration that are necessary
to effect the agreement between the authority and the municipality.
01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010

SB96
(e) A municipality may refinance existing debt obligations after an
authority has filed a petition for detachment to achieve debt service savings
so long as the refinancing does not increase annual debt service payments,
extend the maturity date, or increase the aggregate amount of principal due
with respect to the debt obligation.
(f) Upon the payment in full at maturity or optional redemption, other
than in connection with a refunding permitted under subsection (e) of this
section, the authority's property and operations shall be released and exempt
from future tax collections or payments, as applicable.
(g) A municipality shall not initiate litigation alleging impairment
of contract if the authority and the municipality have entered into a written
agreement under subsection (d) of this section or if the county court has
entered an order for detachment under § 14-362-305(e) that is consistent with
subsection (c) of this section.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity — Effect.
This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2024, and invalidates any
petition to detach filed by a regional airport authority under § 14-362-301
et seq. on or after January 1, 2024.

















01/23/2025 2:52:06 PM ZRC010